Oklahoma, session 2025, SB426.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 353.22.1 of Title 59, unless

there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Chloroquine, hydroxychloroquine, and ivermectin shall be over-

the-counter drugs and a pharmacist or pharmacy shall not require a

prescription for the purchase of such drugs. If the State Board of

Pharmacy finds that a pharmacist or pharmacy is in violation of this

section, the Board shall immediately revoke the license of the

pharmacist or pharmacy and fine the pharmacist or pharmacy One

Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) per occurrence.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.



60-1-1563 DC 1/14/2025 3:51:18 PM

Req. No. 1563 Page 1